Rhode Island, session 2025, SB265.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 23-17.5-33 of the General Laws in Chapter 23-17.5 entitled "Rights
of Nursing Home Patients" is hereby amended to read as follows:
23-17.5-33. Minimum staffing level compliance and enforcement program.
(a) Compliance determination.
(1) The department shall submit proposed rules and regulations for adoption by October
15, 2021, establishing a system for determining compliance with minimum staffing requirements
set forth in § 23-17.5-32.
(2) Compliance shall be determined quarterly by comparing the number of hours provided
per resident, per day using the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services’ payroll-based journal
and the facility’s daily census, as self-reported by the facility to the department on a quarterly basis.
(3) The department shall use the quarterly payroll-based journal and the self-reported
census to calculate the number of hours provided per resident, per day and compare this ratio to the
minimum staffing standards required under § 23-17.5-32. Discrepancies between job titles
contained in § 23-17.5-32 and the payroll-based journal shall be addressed by rules and regulations.
(b) Monetary penalties.
(1) The department shall submit proposed rules and regulations for adoption on or before
October 15, 2021, implementing monetary penalty provisions for facilities not in compliance with
minimum staffing requirements set forth in § 23-17.5-32.
(2) Monetary penalties shall be imposed quarterly and shall be based on the latest quarter

for which the department has data.
(3) No monetary penalty may be issued for noncompliance with the increase in the standard
set forth in § 23-17.5-32(c)(ii) from January 1, 2023, to March 31, 2023. If a facility is found to be
noncompliant with the increase in the standard during the period that extends from January 1, 2023,
to March 31, 2023, the department shall provide a written notice identifying the staffing
deficiencies and require the facility to provide a sufficiently detailed correction plan to meet the
statutory minimum staffing levels.
(4) Monetary penalties shall be established based on a formula that calculates on a daily
basis the cost of wages and benefits for the missing staffing hours.
(5) All notices of noncompliance shall include the computations used to determine
noncompliance and establishing the variance between minimum staffing ratios and the
department’s computations.
(6) The penalty for the first offense shall be two hundred percent (200%) of the cost of
wages and benefits for the missing staffing hours. The penalty shall increase to two hundred fifty
percent (250%) of the cost of wages and benefits for the missing staffing hours for the second
offense and three hundred percent (300%) of the cost of wages and benefits for the missing staffing
hours for the third and all subsequent offenses.
(7) For facilities that have an offense in three (3) consecutive quarters, EOHHS shall deny
any further Medicaid Assistance payments with respect to all individuals entitled to benefits who
are admitted to the facility on or after January 1, 2022, or shall freeze admissions of new residents.
(c)(1) The penalty shall be imposed regardless of whether the facility has committed other
violations of this chapter during the same period that the staffing offense occurred.
(2) The penalty may not be waived except as provided in subsection (c)(3) of this section,
but the department shall have the discretion to determine the gravity of the violation in situations
where there is no more than a ten percent (10%) deviation from the staffing requirements and make
appropriate adjustments to the penalty.
(3) The department is granted discretion to waive the penalty when unforeseen
circumstances have occurred that resulted in call-offs of scheduled staff. This provision shall be
applied no more than two (2) times per calendar year.
(4) Nothing in this section diminishes a facility’s right to appeal pursuant to the provisions
of chapter 35 of title 42 (“administrative procedures”).
(d)(1) Pursuant to rules and regulations established by the department, funds that are
received from financial penalties shall be used for technical assistance or specialized direct care
staff training.
LC000334 - Page 2 of 4

(2) The assessment of a penalty does not supplant the state’s investigation process or
issuance of deficiencies or citations under this title.
(3) A notice of noncompliance, whether or not the penalty is waived, and the penalty
assessment shall be prominently posted in the nursing facility and included on the department’s
website.
(e) Any penalty incurred for any offense committed during calendar years 2022, 2023, and
2024 pursuant to §§ 23-17.5-32, and 23-17.5-33, shall be abated.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000334
========
LC000334 - Page 3 of 4